Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.531

911 advisory committee.

The 911 advisory committee is created to advise and assist the state 911 coordinator in coordinating and facilitating the implementation and operation of 911 throughout the state. The director shall appoint:

(1) County 911 representatives from diverse urban and rural geographical counties;

(2) The statewide 988 coordinator or designee identified by the office of the governor;

(3) Those who represent diverse geographical areas of the state and include state residents who are members of the national emergency number association, the association of public communications officials Washington chapter, the Washington state fire chiefs association, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington state council of firefighters, the Washington state council of police officers, the Washington ambulance association, the Washington state firefighters association, the Washington state association of fire marshals, the Washington fire commissioners association, the Washington state patrol, the association of Washington cities, and the Washington state association of counties;

(4) The utilities and transportation commission or commission staff;

(5) A representative of a voice over internet protocol company;

(6) An equal number of representatives of large and small local exchange telephone companies and large and small radio communications service companies offering commercial mobile radio service in the state;

(7) A representative of the Washington state department of health; and

(8) Other members identified and appointed by the director.

[ 2022 c 203 s 11.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.